West Virginia, session 2026, HB4239.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Division of Financial Institutions. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §31A-4-33 of this code, relating to the Division of Financial Institutions (the notice and treatment of joint accounts, 106 CSR 17), is authorized.